Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 2. Chartered Family Trust Company Act

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 84, § 1 makes the act effective July 1, 2015.

§ 13-5-201.
Short title. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-202.
Purpose. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-203.
Applicability. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-204.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-205.
Organization of a chartered family trust company. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-603

by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-603

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-205.
Organization of a chartered family trust company. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-603

by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-206.
Requirements for chartered family trust company. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-604

by 2019 ch. 13, § 4, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-207.
Naming convention; advertisement of family trust company. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-302

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-208.
Minimum capital requirements; investment of capital. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-605

by 2019 ch. 13, § 4, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-209.
Procedures upon filing of organizational instruments, application and other information; application fee; approval or disapproval of application; criteria for approval; action upon application. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; renumbered to § null by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-210.
Powers of chartered family trust company and family trust company; banking business prohibited. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-601

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-211.
Authorized actions and transactions; conflicts of interest. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-602

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-212.
Financial transactions. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-213.
Powers of commissioner; rulemaking authority. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-214.
Reports to commissioner. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-411

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-215.
Inspection of chartered family trust company; fees; resolution fund account; confidentiality. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-607

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-216.
Fidelity bonds; insurance. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-414

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-217.
Conversion from trust company to chartered family trust company. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-608

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-218.
Conversion from chartered family trust company to trust company. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-522

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-219.
Establishment of trust service offices; application. [Renumbered]

History.

2015 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-424

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.